Oklahoma, session 2025, SB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 1461 Page 1


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Budget


Accountability for State’s Economic Defense (BASED) Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. The Legislature hereby finds:


1. State sovereignty and constitutional duty: The tenth


amendment to the United States Constitution reserves to the states


all powers not delegated to the federal government. Oklahoma has


both the constitutional authority and the fiduciary duty to protect


its citizens from economic harm caused by federal fiscal


mismanagement;


2. The failure of Congress to promote the general welfare:


Section 8 of Article I of the United States Constitution grants


Congress the power to tax to provide for the common defense and


general welfare. However, Congress’s continued failure to enact a


balanced federal budget has resulted in a national debt exceeding


Thirty-six Trillion Dollars ($36,000,000,000,000.00), or more than


One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per U.S. citizen, which


creates an existential threat to the general welfare. Congress’s


failure to fulfill its constitutional duty renders its exercise of


taxing power unconstitutional in effect, as funding such


irresponsible deficits, which, if allowed to continue, will


necessarily lead to financial ruin for American citizens, and


clearly undermines, and does not promote, the general welfare. In

Req. No. 1461 Page 2


United States v. Butler (1936), the Supreme Court held that


Congress’s taxing power must align with promoting the general


welfare. Funding an unbalanced budget violates this principle;


3. Existential threat to national defense: Continuing to run


deficits while the national debt already exceeds Thirty-six Trillion


Dollars ($36,000,000,000,000.00) compromises America’s ability to


provide for the nation’s common defense by:


a. weakening the nation’s economic stability and


eventually leading to economic ruin and the inability


to adequately fund the U.S. military, and


b. undermining its capacity to respond to national


emergencies and foreign threats.


The federal government’s fiscal recklessness jeopardizes the


very foundations of national security and economic health;


4. Fiduciary responsibility and the public trust doctrine:


Congress, under Section 8 of Article I of the United States


Constitution, holds a fiduciary duty to tax and spend for the


benefit of the American people. Decades of deficits and ballooning


debt represent a breach of this public trust, imposing undue


financial burdens on the citizens and states. Under the Public


Trust Doctrine, when a fiduciary fails to act in a way that could be


reasonably characterized as responsible, beneficiaries, or in this


case the states, have the right and obligation to intervene to


ensure proper use of resources. Oklahoma, as a sovereign state,

Req. No. 1461 Page 3


must shield its citizens from participation in this irresponsible


and unconstitutional fiscal system;


5. This state’s obligation to protect property rights: Section


of Article II of the Oklahoma Constitution states, “All persons


have the inherent right to life, liberty, the pursuit of happiness,


and the enjoyment of the gains of their own industry”. The


devaluation of citizens’ labor and property through inflation and


unbalanced federal spending undermines this fundamental right.


Oklahoma has an obligation to protect its citizens’ income and


wealth from the economic harm currently being inflicted and the


unimaginable harm to come if the federal deficit continues to grow;


6. Emergency doctrine and state intervention: The current


fiscal crisis, including decades of unbalanced budgets and


unsustainable debt, constitutes an economic and national emergency.


Under the emergency doctrine, states have the authority to take


extraordinary measures to preserve the welfare of their citizens.


In Home Building & Loan Association v. Blaisdell (1934), the Supreme


Court upheld state actions during emergencies to protect the public


welfare. This state asserts that the withholding of federal taxes


until Congress enacts a balanced budget is a temporary and necessary


action to avert economic catastrophe caused by willful fiscal


negligence;


7. Temporary, defensive, and constructive action: The Taxpayer


Protection Escrow Fund is a temporary, non-violent assertion of the

Req. No. 1461 Page 4


sovereign duty of this state to protect its citizens. It does not


seek to nullify federal law but, instead, establishes conditions for


compliance based on constitutional principles. The action of this


state is:


a. temporary - withholding continues until Congress


enacts a balanced budget,


b. defensive - shielding the citizens of this state from


economic harm caused by federal fiscal


irresponsibility, and


c. constructive - encouraging Congress to restore fiscal


discipline and fulfill its constitutional duty to


promote the general welfare; and


8. DOGE proposals are on the table: The Department of


Government Efficiency is in the process of making proposals to


reduce federal spending by Two Trillion Dollars


($2,000,000,000,000.00) which could balance the budget if


implemented by Congress and voters gave lawmakers a clear mandate to


do so.


B. It is the intent of the Legislature to:


1. Withhold the remittance of federal income taxes collected


within this state until the United States Congress passes a balanced


federal budget; and


2. Protect Oklahoma taxpayers, state employees, agencies,


businesses, and entities from retaliation by the federal government

Req. No. 1461 Page 5


for this state’s lawful assertion of its constitutional duty to


safeguard citizens.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 37 of Title 62, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Office of the State Treasurer to be designated the


“Taxpayer Protection Escrow Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Treasurer from federal income


tax withholdings collected in this state. All monies accruing to


the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted


and expended by the Treasurer for the purpose provided for in this


section and Section 4 of this act. Expenditures from the fund shall


be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims


filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. Upon certification of a balanced federal budget at least


thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the federal fiscal year,


the State Treasurer shall disburse the funds deposited pursuant to


the provisions of Section 4 of this act to the United States


Treasury.


C. If no balanced federal budget is certified pursuant to


subsection B of this section, the State Treasurer shall, within

Req. No. 1461 Page 6


ninety (90) days, return payments made by employers and taxpayers


pursuant to Section 4 of this act. Employers shall pay the


withholdings of each employee to the employee within one (1) week of


receiving the funds.


D. Interest earned from the investment of funds deposited in


the Taxpayer Protection Escrow Revolving Fund shall be deposited in


the Taxpayer Defense Fund created pursuant to Section 6 of this act.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 37.1 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon the effective date of this act, all employers in this


state required to withhold federal taxes pursuant to Publication 15


of the Internal Revenue Service using the federal form W-4 of an


employee shall withhold the amount prescribed pursuant to


Publication 15 and form W-4 and make payment of the withholding to


the Office of the State Treasurer. All taxpayers required to submit


estimated tax pursuant to Publication 505 of the Internal Revenue


Service using federal Form 1040-ES or 1040-SS or any other


withholdings required pursuant to Publication 505 of the Internal


Revenue Service shall calculate the amount of estimated tax or


withholding pursuant to the publication and make payment to the


Office of the State Treasurer.


B. The State Treasurer, upon receipt of funds pursuant to


subsection A of this section, shall deposit the funds in the

Req. No. 1461 Page 7


Taxpayer Protection Escrow Revolving Fund created in Section 3 of


this act.


C. The Office of the State Treasurer shall electronically


submit a quarterly report to the Legislature detailing deposits,


account transfers, interest earned, and the balance of the Taxpayer


Protection Escrow Revolving Fund. The State Auditor and Inspector


shall annually audit the Taxpayer Protection Escrow Revolving Fund.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 37.2 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The federal government is prohibited from any punitive


action against any citizen, state employee, state agency, political


subdivision, business, or entity within this state for compliance


with the provisions of this act. Any attempt by the federal


government to withhold federal funds otherwise lawfully allocated to


this state shall be deemed unlawful and unconstitutional.


B. Any federal fines, sanctions, punishments, or penalties


levied or enforced against any individual or employer for compliance


with the provisions of this act shall be null and void.


C. The Attorney General shall indemnify any citizen, entity,


and agency penalized by the federal government due to compliance


with the provisions of this act. The Attorney General shall, if


requested by a citizen, entity, or government entity of this state,



Req. No. 1461 Page 8


provide legal defense against retaliation by the federal government


due to compliance with the provisions of this act.


D. The Attorney General may request from the State Treasurer


funds deposited in the Taxpayer Defense Fund created pursuant to


Section 6 of this act for costs associated with effectuating the


provisions of subsection C of this section.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 37.3 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Office of the State Treasurer to be designated the


“Taxpayer Defense Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not


subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies


earned as interest from investment of funds in the Taxpayer


Protection Escrow Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 3 of


this act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Treasurer for


the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures from the


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


B. The State Treasurer shall expend deposits to this fund on


legal protection and defense for any citizen, entity, or government

Req. No. 1461 Page 9


entity of this state from federal retaliation for compliance with


this act.


SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1461 QD 12/30/2024 11:00:09 PM

































Req. No. 1461 Page 10